Rhode Island statutes. Title 10 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure in Particular Actions
Chapter 2 Account

10-2-1.
Account between owners of common property.

Whenever two (2) or more persons have and hold any estate, interest or property, whether real or personal, in common as joint tenants, tenants in common, co-parceners or joint owners and one or more of the owners of the common property shall take, receive, use or have benefit thereof, in greater proportion than his, her, or their interest therein, such owner or owners, his, her, or their executors and administrators shall be liable to render his, her, or their account of the use and profit of such common property to his, her or their fellow commoner or commoners, jointly or severally; and such of the fellow commoner or commoners or any or either of them, their executors or administrators, shall have his, her, or their action against such receiver or receivers or either of them, as his, her, or their bailiff or bailiffs, for receiving more than his, her, or their part or proportion as provided in this section.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 273, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 337, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 388, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 590, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-2-1

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 26.

10-2-2.
Appointment and meeting of auditors.

Upon rendering final judgment against the defendant in an action under §

10-2-1

that he or she shall account, the court rendering the final judgment shall appoint not more than three (3) auditors who, upon being sworn by the court, or any justice of the peace or notary public, to a faithful and impartial discharge of their duties, shall appoint a time and place to meet the parties in the action and to take the account, as required in the court’s judgment, and shall give notice of the meeting to the parties.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 273, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 337, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 388, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 590, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

10-2-2

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 26.

10-2-3.
Commitment of parties refusing to give evidence to auditors.

Whenever any defendant shall unreasonably refuse or neglect to appear at the time and place assigned by the auditors or, after appearing, shall refuse or neglect to render an account, the auditors may award to the plaintiff the whole of his or her demand, and the auditors may administer an oath to the parties, respectively, and examine them respecting their accounts and the matters submitted to them, and upon either of the parties refusing to take an oath truly to answer such questions as shall be asked or to answer directly to the interrogatories put to him or her, the auditors may commit him or her to jail, there to remain at his or her own charge until he or she consent to take the oath and answer the interrogatories.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 273, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 337, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 388, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 590, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

10-2-3

.

10-2-4.
Judgment on auditors’ award.

Whenever the auditors appointed in any case shall have made their report or award concerning the matter submitted to them to the court from whence they shall have received their appointment, if no legal cause shall be shown for setting aside the auditor’s award or report, judgment shall be rendered in conformity thereto, and also for costs, including such reasonable allowance to the auditors for their services as the court shall judge proper to make, and the reasonable compensation to the auditors shall be paid by the party in whose favor final judgment shall be rendered before he or she shall have execution on the court’s judgment.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 273, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 337, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 388, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 590, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

10-2-4

.

10-2-5.
Majority report of auditors — Quorum.

If a major part of the auditors appointed in any case agree to and assign such report or award, the report or award shall be equally binding and conclusive as if agreed to and signed by all of them; provided, that it shall be necessary, in order to give validity to the report or award, that all the auditors shall accept of their appointment and meet on the subject matter thereof.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 273, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 337, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 388, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 590, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

10-2-5

.